Washington statutes.
RCW 19.149.020

Purchase money residential mortgage loans—Provision to borrower of documents used by lender to evaluate value—Written waiver.

A lender shall provide to the borrower, prior to the closing of a residential mortgage loan, true and complete copies of all appraisals or other documents relied upon by the lender in evaluating the value of the dwelling to be financed. A borrower may waive in writing the lender's duty to provide the appraisals or other documents prior to closing. This written waiver may not be construed to in any way limit the lender's duty to provide the information to the borrower at a reasonable later date. This section shall only apply to purchase money residential mortgage loans.

[ 1994 c 295 s 2.]